Hawaii statutes.
§207-16 Construction. Nothing in this
part shall require any corporation to qualify to do business in this State, or
subject any person, firm, corporation, or trust to taxation under any law of
this State if, but for the enactment of this chapter, the person, firm,
corporation, or trust would not have been required so to qualify or be subject
to such taxation. [L 1961, c 194, §13; Supp, §98L-13; HRS §207-16]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next